Wisconsin, session 2025, SB26.
do enact as follows:SB26,13Section 1. 38.14 (2) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB26,2,2438.14 (2) (d) 1. Lease facilities to others for school purposes. The district 1board may not enter into a lease under this subdivision after June 30, 1999, except 2a lease of facilities for the operation of a child care center.SB26,23Section 2. Initial applicability.SB26,2,54(1) This act first applies to a lease entered into on the effective date of this 5subsection.SB26,2,66